test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tyTS_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ты: # Noun 'reindeer / (fin) poro' - partial paradigm /Type 1 e~i/ - pya
     ты+N+Sg+Nom: ты
     ты+N+Sg+Acc: тымʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Gen: тыʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat: тэнʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc: тэхэна
     ты+N+Sg+Abl: тэхэд
     ты+N+Sg+Pros: тэвна
     ты+N+Du+Nom: тэхэʼ
     ты+N+Du+Acc: тэхэʼ
     ты+N+Du+Gen: тэхэʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom: тыˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Acc: ты
     ты+N+Pl+Gen: тыˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Dat: тэхэˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc: тэхэˮна
     ты+N+Pl+Abl: тэхэт
     ты+N+Pl+Pros: тэˮэмна
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [тэв, тэми]
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [тэв, тэми]
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [тэн, тэни]
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [тэхэн, тэхэни]
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [тэхэнан, тэхэнани]
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [тэхэдан, тэхэдани]
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [тэвнан, тэвнани]
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [тэхэюн, тэхэюни]
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [тэхэюн, тэхэюни]
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [тэхэюн, тэхэюни]
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [тын, тыни]
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [тын, тыни]
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [тыˮын, тыˮни]
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [тэхэˮн, тэхэˮни]
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [тэхэˮнан, тэхэˮнани]
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [тэхэтан, тэхэтани]
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [тэˮэмнан, тэˮэмнани]
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: тэр
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: тэмд
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: тэнд
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: тэхэнд
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: тэхэнанд
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: тэхэданд
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: тэвнанд
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: тэхэюд
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: тэхэюд
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: тэхэют
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: тыд
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: тыд
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: тыт
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: тэхэт
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: тэхэˮнат
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: тэхэтат
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: тэˮэмнат
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: тэда
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: тэмда
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: тэнда
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: тэхэнда
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: тэхэнанда
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: тэхэданда
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: тэвнанда
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: тэхэюда
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: тэхэюда
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: тэхэюта
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: тыда
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: тыда
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: тыта
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: тэхэта
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: тэхэˮната
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: тэхэтата
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: тэˮэмната
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: тэмиʼ
#     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: тэми
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: тэмиʼ
#     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: тэми
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: тэниʼ
#     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: тэни
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: тэхэниʼ
#     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: тэхэни
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: тэхэнаниʼ
#     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: тэхэнани
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: тэхэданиʼ
#     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: тэхэдани
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: тэвнаниʼ
#     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: тэвнани
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: тэхэюниʼ
#     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: тэхэюни
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: тэхэюниʼ
#     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: тэхэюни
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: тэхэюниʼ
#     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: тэхэюни
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: тыниʼ
#     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: тыни
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: тыниʼ
#     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: тыни
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: тыˮниʼ
#     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: тыˮни
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: тэхэˮниʼ
#     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: тэхэˮни
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: тэхэˮнаниʼ
#     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: тэхэˮнани
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: тэхэтаниʼ
#     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: тэхэтани
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: тэˮэмнаниʼ
#     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: тэˮэмнани
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: тэриʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: тэмдиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: тэндиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: тэхэндиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: тэхэнандиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: тэхэдандиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: тэвнандиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: тэхэюдиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: тэхэюдиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: тэхэютиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: тыдиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: тыдиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: тытиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: тэхэтиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: тэхэˮнатиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: тэхэтатиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: тэˮэмнатиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: тэдиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: тэмдиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: тэндиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: тэхэндиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: тэхэнандиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: тэхэдандиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: тэвнандиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: тэхэюдиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: тэхэюдиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: тэхэютиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: тыдиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: тыдиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: тытиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: тэхэтиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: тэхэˮнатиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: тэхэтатиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: тэˮэмнатиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: тэваˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: тэваˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: тэнаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: тэхэнаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: тэхэнанаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: тэхэданаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: тэвнанаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: тэхэюнаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: тэхэюнаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: тэхэюнаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: тынаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: тынаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: тыˮнаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: тэхэˮнаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: тэхэˮнанаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: тэхэтанаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: тэˮэмнанаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: тэраˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: тэмдаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: тэндаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: тэхэндаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: тэхэнандаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: тэхэдандаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: тэвнандаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: тэхэюдаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: тэхэюдаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: тэхэютаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: тыдаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: тыдаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: тытаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: тэхэтаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: тэхэˮнатаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: тэхэтатаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: тэˮэмнатаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: тэдоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: тэмдоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: тэндоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: тэхэндоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: тэхэнандоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: тэхэдандоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: тэвнандоʼ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: тэхэюдоʼ
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: тэхэюдоʼ
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: тэхэютоʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: тыдоʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: тыдоʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: тытоʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: тэхэтоʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: тэхэˮнатоʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: тэхэтатоʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: тэˮэмнатоʼ
     ты+N+Pred+Abs: тэд
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [тэдав, тэдув, тэдами, тэдми]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [тэдав, тэдув, тэдами, тэдми]
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [тэдан, тэдани, тэдни]
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: тэдар
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: тэдамд
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: тэданд
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [тэдада, тэдда]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: тэдамда
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: тэданда
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [тэдамиʼ, тэдмиʼ]
#     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [тэдами, тэдми]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [тэдамиʼ, тэдмиʼ]
#     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [тэдами, тэдми]
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [тэданиʼ, тэдниʼ]
#     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [тэдани, тэдни]
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [тэдариʼ, тэдриʼ]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: тэдамдиʼ
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: тэдандиʼ
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [тэдадиʼ, тэддиʼ]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: тэдамдиʼ
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: тэдандиʼ
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [тэдаваˮ, тэдваˮ]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [тэдаваˮ, тэдваˮ]
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [тэданаˮ, тэднаˮ]
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [тэдараˮ, тэдраˮ]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: тэдамдаˮ
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: тэдандаˮ
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [тэдадоʼ, тэддоʼ]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: тэдамдоʼ
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: тэдандоʼ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: тэдмʼ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: тэн
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ты
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: тэниʼ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: тэдиʼ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тэхэʼ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: тэваˮ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: тэдаˮ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тыˮ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: тэдамзь
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: тэнась
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [тысь, тэсь]
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: тэнинзь
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: тэдинзь
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тэхэнзь
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: тэваць
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: тэдаць
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [тыць, тэць]
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тэв
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тэр
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тэда
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тэмиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тэриʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тэдиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тэваˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тэраˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тэдоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тэвась
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тэрась
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тэдась
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тэминзь
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тэринзь
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тэдинзь
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тэваць
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тэраць
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тэдонзь
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тэхэюн
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тэхэюд
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тэхэюда
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тэхэюниʼ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тэхэюдиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тэхэюдиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тэхэюнаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тэхэюдаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тэхэюдоʼ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тэхэюнась
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тэхэюдась
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тэхэюдась
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тэхэюнинзь
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тэхэюдинзь
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тэхэюдинзь
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тэхэюнаць
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тэхэюдаць
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тэхэюдонзь
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тын
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тыд
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тыда
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тыниʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тыдиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тыдиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тынаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тыдаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тыдоʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тынась
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тыдась
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тыдась
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тынинзь
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тыдинзь
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тыдинзь
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тынаць
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тыдаць
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тыдонзь
     ты+N+Tra: тэӈэ
     ты+N+Car: тэсиˮ
     ты+N+Equ: тэдремʼ
     ты+N+Equ+Lat: тэдревʼ
